Utah statutes.
19-9-110.   Application of proceeds from sale of obligations.
Proceeds from the sale of obligations shall be applied solely to the purposes
for which they were issued.  Accrued interest and premiums received upon such
sale and any proceeds not needed for the purposes for which the obligations
were issued, however, shall be applied to payment of principal or interest on
such obligations.
